Maine, session 132, LD180.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4349-A is enacted to read:
§4349-A. Discriminatory reimbursement of pharmacy providers prohibited
A carrier, or a pharmacy benefits manager under contract with a carrier, may not
reimburse a pharmacy provider for a prescription drug or pharmacy service in an amount
that is less than the reimbursement amount paid to a pharmacy provider affiliated with the
carrier or pharmacy benefits manager for the same prescription drug or pharmacy service.
Page 1 - 132LR0281(03)